test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ainwq11_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - ainõq: # Noun (11) ainõq 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     ainõq+N+Sg+Nom: ainõq
     ainõq+N+Sg+Gen: ainõ
     ainõq+N+Sg+Par: ainõt
     ainõq+N+Sg+Ill: [ainõhe, ainõdõ]
     ainõq+N+Sg+Ine: [ainõn, ainõh, ainõhn]
     ainõq+N+Sg+Ela: ainõst
     ainõq+N+Sg+All: ainõlõ
     ainõq+N+Sg+Ade: ainõl
     ainõq+N+Sg+Abl: ainõlt
     ainõq+N+Sg+Tra: ainõs
     ainõq+N+Sg+Ter: ainõniq
     ainõq+N+Sg+Abe: ainõldaq
     ainõq+N+Sg+Com: ainõgaq
     ainõq+N+Pl+Nom: ainõq
     ainõq+N+Pl+Gen: [ainidõ, ainiidõ]
     ainõq+N+Pl+Par: [ainit, ainiid]
     ainõq+N+Pl+Ill: [ainihe, ainiihe, ainõtõhe]
     ainõq+N+Pl+Ine: [ainin, ainih, ainihn, ainiin, ainiih, ainiihn]
     ainõq+N+Pl+Ela: [ainist, ainiist]
     ainõq+N+Pl+All: [ainilõ, ainiilõ, ainõtõlõ]
     ainõq+N+Pl+Ade: [ainil, ainiil]
     ainõq+N+Pl+Abl: [ainilt, ainiilt]
     ainõq+N+Pl+Tra: [ainis, ainiis]
     ainõq+N+Pl+Ter: [aininiq, ainiiniq]
     ainõq+N+Pl+Abe: [ainildaq, ainiildaq]
     ainõq+N+Pl+Com: [ainidõgaq, ainiidõgaq]
